Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1286
Deleted.

The Nebraska Supreme Court in State v. Munn, 212 Neb. 265, 322 N.W.2d 429 (1982), held that "the adoption of the Nebraska Rules of Evidence repealed section 25-1286". The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-705 deleted section 25-1286 to harmonize the legislative actions with the Supreme Court decision.